New Jersey, session 222, A5080.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A municipality that, by ordinance pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1991, c.285 (C.39:4-8.1) or R.S.39:4-197, establishes a restricted parking space or spaces upon land owned or leased and maintained by the municipality or the board of education of a school district for the public parking of vehicles adjacent to an athletic field used for a youth sports activity for use by persons who have been issued special vehicle identification cards by the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, pursuant to the provisions of section 2 of P.L.1949, c.280 (C.39:4-205), when using a motor vehicle displaying a special vehicle identification placard or license plate issued pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1949, c.280 (C.39:4-206), shall establish the restricted parking space or spaces in a location that allows the driver and front seat passenger of the vehicle to view youth sports activities on that athletic field, provided that the activities on the athletic field are visible from the parking area.  The provisions of this section shall apply when a municipality or board of education of a school district constructs, expands, resurfaces, or repaints a parking area adjacent to an athletic field used for a youth sports activity. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.